Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4628
Revocation or amendment of release.

A powerholder may revoke or amend a release of a power of appointment only to the extent that:

(1) the instrument of release is revocable by the powerholder; or

(2) the powerholder reserves a power of revocation or amendment in the instrument of release.

Laws 2021, LB501, § 51.